Wisconsin, session 2025, AB336.
do enact as follows:AB336,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB336,27Section 2. 20.285 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB336,2,11820.285 (1) (cm) Additional student health services. The amounts in the 9schedule to provide additional or improved student health services related to 10mental and behavioral health, including additional or improved staffing, training, 11operations, assessment, and prevention.AB336,2,1212